District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1204

Duties of the Advisory Committee.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 5, 29 DCR 2872
May 20, 1983, D.C. Law 5-9, § 2, 30 DCR 1791
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-18, § 2, 30 DCR 3326
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(k), 30 DCR 4289
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(d), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1803.